Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.110

Payment by insurance company, bank, etc.—No additional liability.

Any insurance company making payment according to the terms of its policy or any bank or other person performing an obligation for the slayer or abuser as one of several joint obligees shall not be subjected to additional liability by the terms of this chapter if such payment or performance is made without written notice, at its home office or at an individual's home or business address, of the killing by a slayer or financial exploitation by an abuser.

[ 2009 c 525 s 11; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.110. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 11.]